Nevada, session 83, AB221.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 449.441 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.441 The provisions of NRS 449.435 to 449.448, inclusive,
do not apply to an office of a physician or a facility that provides
health care, other than a medical facility, if the office of a physician
or the facility only administers [a] :
1. A medication to a patient to relieve the patient’s anxiety or
pain and if the medication is not given in a dosage that is sufficient
to induce in a patient a controlled state of depressed consciousness
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
or unconsciousness similar to general anesthesia, deep sedation or
conscious sedation.
2. General anesthesia, conscious sedation or deep sedation to
dental patients and the administration is performed by a physician
who:
(a) Is also licensed to practice dentistry pursuant to chapter
631 of NRS;
(b) Holds a permit issued pursuant to NRS 631.265 to
administer general anesthesia, minimal sedation, moderate
sedation or deep sedation to dental patients; and
(c) Administers general anesthesia or sedation of any type only
within the scope of the permit described in paragraph (b).
Sec. 2. NRS 630.373 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.373 1. A physician shall not administer or supervise
directly the administration of general anesthesia, conscious sedation
or deep sedation to patients unless the general anesthesia, conscious
sedation or deep sedation is administered:
(a) In an office of a physician or osteopathic physician which
[holds] :
(1) Holds a permit pursuant to NRS 449.435 to 449.448,
inclusive; or
(2) Is exempt from the provisions of NRS 449.435 to
449.448, inclusive, pursuant to NRS 449.441;
(b) In a facility which [holds] :
(1) Holds a permit pursuant to NRS 449.435 to 449.448,
inclusive; or
(2) Is exempt from the provisions of NRS 449.435 to
449.448, inclusive, pursuant to NRS 449.441;
(c) In a medical facility as that term is defined in NRS
449.0151; or
(d) Outside of this State.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Conscious sedation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.436.
(b) “Deep sedation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.437.
(c) “General anesthesia” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.438.
Sec. 3. NRS 633.694 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.694 1. An osteopathic physician shall not administer or
supervise directly the administration of general anesthesia,
conscious sedation or deep sedation to patients unless the general
anesthesia, conscious sedation or deep sedation is administered:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) In an office of a physician or osteopathic physician which
[holds] :
(1) Holds a permit pursuant to NRS 449.435 to 449.448,
inclusive; or
(2) Is exempt from the provisions of NRS 449.435 to
449.448, inclusive, pursuant to NRS 449.441;
(b) In a facility which [holds] :
(1) Holds a permit pursuant to NRS 449.435 to 449.448,
inclusive; or
(2) Is exempt from the provisions of NRS 449.435 to
449.448, inclusive, pursuant to NRS 449.441;
(c) In a medical facility as that term is defined in NRS
449.0151; or
(d) Outside of this State.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Conscious sedation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.436.
(b) “Deep sedation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.437.
(c) “General anesthesia” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.438.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)